Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 2. VOTER QUALIFICATIONS AND REGISTRATION

CHAPTER 11. QUALIFICATIONS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR VOTING

Sec. 11.001. ELIGIBILITY TO VOTE. (a) Except as otherwise provided by law, to be eligible to vote in an election in this state, a person must:

(1) be a qualified voter as defined by Section 11.002 on the day the person offers to vote;

(2) be a resident of the territory covered by the election for the office or measure on which the person desires to vote; and

(3) satisfy all other requirements for voting prescribed by law for the particular election.

(b) For a person who resides on property located in more than one territory described by Subsection (a)(2), the person shall choose in which territory the residence of the person is located.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1107 (H.B. 2309), Sec. 1.06, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 11.002. QUALIFIED VOTER. (a) In this code, "qualified voter" means a person who:

(1) is 18 years of age or older;

(2) is a United States citizen;

(3) has not been determined by a final judgment of a court exercising probate jurisdiction to be:

(A) totally mentally incapacitated; or

(B) partially mentally incapacitated without the right to vote;

(4) has not been finally convicted of a felony or, if so convicted, has:

(A) fully discharged the person's sentence, including any term of incarceration, parole, or supervision, or completed a period of probation ordered by any court; or

(B) been pardoned or otherwise released from the resulting disability to vote;

(5) is a resident of this state; and

(6) is a registered voter.

(b) For purposes of Subsection (a)(4), a person is not considered to have been finally convicted of an offense for which the criminal proceedings are deferred without an adjudication of guilt.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 54, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 6.01, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 916, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 850, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 614 (H.B. 417), Sec. 22, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 744 (H.B. 1226), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 11.003. PLACE FOR VOTING. Except as otherwise provided by this code, a person may vote only in the election precinct in which the person resides.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 11.004. VOTING IN PRECINCT OF FORMER RESIDENCE. A registered voter who changes residence to another election precinct in the same county, if otherwise eligible, may vote a full ballot in the election precinct of former residence until the voter's registration becomes effective in the new precinct if the voter satisfies the residence requirements prescribed by Section 63.0011 and submits a statement of residence in accordance with that section.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 916, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 11.005. EFFECT OF VOTE BY VOTER REGISTERED IN WRONG PRECINCT. If a voter who is erroneously registered in an election precinct in which the voter does not reside is permitted to vote by an election officer who does not know of the erroneous registration, the votes for the offices and measures on which the voter would have been eligible to vote in the voter's precinct of residence are valid unless the voter intentionally gave false information to procure the erroneous registration.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.